Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-823
Taxes and assessments; how assessed and collected.

Taxes, assessments, and other charges of this state, of any political subdivision, of any special improvement district, or of any other taxing or assessing authority shall be assessed against and collected on each individual apartment, each of which shall be carried on the tax books as a separate and distinct entity for that purpose, and not on the building or buildings or property as a whole. No forfeiture or sale of the building or buildings or property as a whole for delinquent taxes, assessments, or charges shall ever divest or in anywise affect the title to an individual apartment so long as taxes, assessments, and charges on the individual apartment are currently paid. The common elements, both general and limited, shall not be separately taxed or foreclosed for tax purposes. The value of the common elements shall be determined by the assessor and apportioned for taxes against the several apartments in proportion to the basic values referred to in sections 76-806 and 76-809. Restrictions on alienation of the common elements shall be given weight by the assessor in determining valuations. For condominiums created in this state before January 1, 1984, the provisions on the separate taxation of each apartment in section 76-829 shall apply to the extent necessary in construing the provisions of sections 76-827, 76-829 to 76-831, 76-840, 76-841, 76-869, 76-874, 76-876, 76-884, and 76-891.01, and subdivisions (a)(1) to (a)(6) and (a)(11) to (a)(16) of section 76-860 which apply to events and circumstances which occur after January 1, 1984.

Laws 1963, c. 429, § 23, p. 1445;

Laws 1974, LB 730, § 13;

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 81;

Laws 1993, LB 478, § 10.